test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_CW_jooweshk_gt-glossing.yaml
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4: jooweshkoonymini
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4: jooweshkoonsmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: njooweshkoonymiba
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: njooweshkoonymidig
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: njooweshkoonsmiba
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: njooweshkoonsmidig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: gjooweshkoonymiba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkoonymidig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: gjooweshkoonsmiba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkoonsmidig
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: jooweshkoonymiba
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: jooweshkoonymidig
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: jooweshkoonsmiba
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: jooweshkoonsmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: njooweshkoonyman
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: njooweshkoonyming
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: njooweshkoonymag
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: njooweshkoonsman
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: njooweshkoonsming
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: njooweshkoonsmag
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: gjooweshkoonyman
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: gjooweshkoonyming
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: gjooweshkoonymag
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: gjooweshkoonsman
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: gjooweshkoonsming
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: gjooweshkoonsmag
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: jooweshkoonyman
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: jooweshkoonyming
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: jooweshkoonsman
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: jooweshkoonsming
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: jooweshkoonyman
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: jooweshkoonyming
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: jooweshkoonymag
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: jooweshkoonsman
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: jooweshkoonsming
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: jooweshkoonsmag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: njooweshkoonyshinaa
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: njooweshkoonsshinaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: gjooweshkoonyshinaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl: gjooweshkoonyshiwaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: gjooweshkoonsshinaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl: gjooweshkoonsshiwaa
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+3+4: jooweshkoonyshini
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4: jooweshkoonsshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: njooweshkoonyshiba
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: njooweshkoonyshidig
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: njooweshkoonsshiba
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: njooweshkoonsshidig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: gjooweshkoonyshiba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkoonyshidig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: gjooweshkoonsshiba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkoonsshidig
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: jooweshkoonyshiba
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: jooweshkoonyshidig
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: jooweshkoonsshiba
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: jooweshkoonsshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+4: njooweshkoonyshan
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: njooweshkoonyshing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: njooweshkoonyshag
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+4: njooweshkoonsshan
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: njooweshkoonsshing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: njooweshkoonsshag
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+4: gjooweshkoonyshan
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: gjooweshkoonyshing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: gjooweshkoonyshag
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+4: gjooweshkoonsshan
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: gjooweshkoonsshing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: gjooweshkoonsshag
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+4: jooweshkoonyshan
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: jooweshkoonyshing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+4: jooweshkoonsshan
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: jooweshkoonsshing
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+4: jooweshkoonyshan
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: jooweshkoonyshing
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: jooweshkoonyshag
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+4: jooweshkoonsshan
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: jooweshkoonsshing
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: jooweshkoonsshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: njooweshkoonynaanba
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: njooweshkoonynaandig
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: njooweshkoonsnaanba
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: njooweshkoonsnaandig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: gjooweshkoonynaanba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkoonynaandig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt: gjooweshkoonywaaba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkoonywaadig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: gjooweshkoonsnaanba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkoonsnaandig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt: gjooweshkoonswaaba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkoonswaadig
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+3+4+Prt: jooweshkoonyniwba
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt: jooweshkoonsniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: njooweshkoonynaanin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: njooweshkoonynaaning
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: njooweshkoonynaanig
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: njooweshkoonsnaanin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: njooweshkoonsnaaning
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: njooweshkoonsnaanig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: gjooweshkoonynaanin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: gjooweshkoonynaaning
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: gjooweshkoonynaanig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: gjooweshkoonywaan
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: gjooweshkoonywaang
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+2+Pl+Pl: gjooweshkoonywaag
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: gjooweshkoonsnaanin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: gjooweshkoonsnaaning
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: gjooweshkoonsnaanig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: gjooweshkoonswaan
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: gjooweshkoonswaang
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Pl: gjooweshkoonswaag
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: jooweshkoonywaan
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: jooweshkoonywaang
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+3+4+4: jooweshkoonyniwan
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+3+4+Loc: jooweshkoonyniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: jooweshkoonswaan
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: jooweshkoonswaang
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+3+4+4: jooweshkoonsniwan
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+3+4+Loc: jooweshkoonsniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+4: njooweshkoonybaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: njooweshkoonybaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: njooweshkoonybaniig
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+4: njooweshkoonsbaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: njooweshkoonsbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: njooweshkoonsbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonybaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonybaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonybaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+4: gjooweshkoonsbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkoonsbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkoonsbaniig
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+4: jooweshkoonybaniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonybaniing
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+4: jooweshkoonsbaniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonsbaniing
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+4: jooweshkoonybaniin
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonybaniing
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: jooweshkoonybaniig
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+4: jooweshkoonsbaniin
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonsbaniing
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: jooweshkoonsbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: njooweshkmishnaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gjooweshkmishnaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gjooweshkmishwaa
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: jooweshkmishni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: njooweshkmishba
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: njooweshkmishdig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gjooweshkmishba
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkmishdig
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: jooweshkmishba
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: jooweshkmishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: njooweshkmishan
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: njooweshkmishing
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: njooweshkmishag
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: gjooweshkmishan
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gjooweshkmishing
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gjooweshkmishag
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: jooweshkmishan
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: jooweshkmishing
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: jooweshkmishan
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: jooweshkmishing
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: jooweshkmishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: njooweshkminaanba
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: njooweshkminaandig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gjooweshkminaanba
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkminaandig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gjooweshkmiwaaba
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkmiwaadig
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: jooweshkminwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: njooweshkminaanin
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: njooweshkminaaning
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: njooweshkminaanig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gjooweshkminaanin
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gjooweshkminaaning
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gjooweshkminaanig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gjooweshkmiwaan
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gjooweshkmiwaang
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gjooweshkmiwaag
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: jooweshkmiwaan
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: jooweshkmiwaang
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+3+4+4: jooweshkminwan
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: jooweshkminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: njooweshkmibniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: njooweshkmibniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: njooweshkmibniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: gjooweshkmibniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkmibniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkmibniig
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: jooweshkmibniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: jooweshkmibniing
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: jooweshkmibniin
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: jooweshkmibniing
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: jooweshkmibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: njooweshkshinaanba
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: njooweshkshinaandig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gjooweshkshinaanba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkshinaandig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gjooweshkshiwaaba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkshiwaadig
     3+jooweshk+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt: jooweshkshinwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: njooweshkshinaanin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: njooweshkshinaaning
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: njooweshkshinaanig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: gjooweshkshinaanin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gjooweshkshinaaning
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gjooweshkshinaanig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+2+Pl+4: gjooweshkshiwaan
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gjooweshkshiwaang
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gjooweshkshiwaag
     3+jooweshk+NA+Pej+2+Pl+4: jooweshkshiwaan
     3+jooweshk+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: jooweshkshiwaang
     3+jooweshk+NA+Pej+3+4+4: jooweshkshinwan
     3+jooweshk+NA+Pej+3+4+Loc: jooweshkshiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+4: njooweshkshibniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: njooweshkshibniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: njooweshkshibniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+4: gjooweshkshibniin
